Maryland, session 2026, SB0121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
SUBTITLE 4. PERSONAL INFORMATION – PUBLIC SERVANT PROTECTIONS.
7–401.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ACTUAL ADDRESS” MEANS A RESIDENTIAL STREET ADDRESS,
INCLUDING PRIMARY RESIDENCE OR SECONDARY RESIDENCE, OF A PROTECTED
INDIVIDUAL AS SPECIFIED ON THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL’S APPLICATION TO BE A
PROGRAM PARTICIPANT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) “GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY” MEANS A STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITY.
(D) (1) “PERSONAL INFORMATION” MEANS:
(I) A HOME ADDRESS;
(II) A HOME TELEPHONE NUMBER;
(III) A MOBILE TELEPHONE NUMBER;
(IV) A PERSONAL E–MAIL ADDRESS;
(V) A SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER;
(VI) A DRIVER’S LICENSE NUMBER;
(VII) A FEDERAL TAX IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;
(VIII) A BANK ACCOUNT NUMBER;
(IX) A CREDIT OR DEBIT CARD NUMBER;
(X) A LICENSE PLATE NUMBER OR UNIQUE IDENTIFIER OF A
VEHICLE;

SENATE BILL 121 3
(XI) A BIRTH OR MARITAL RECORD;
(XII) A CHILD’S NAME;
(XIII) A SCHOOL OR DAYCARE;
(XIV) A PLACE OF WORSHIP; OR
(XV) A PLACE OF EMPLOYMENT OF AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (G)(8) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) “PERSONAL INFORMATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) INFORMATION THAT HAS BEEN PUBLICLY DISCLOSED WITH
THE CONSENT OF THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL; OR
(II) INFORMATION THAT IS RELEVANT TO AND DISPLAYED AS
PART OF A NEWS STORY, COMMENTARY, AN EDITORIAL, OR ANY OTHER SPEECH ON
MATTERS OF PUBLIC CONCERN.
(E) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE PUBLIC SERVANT ADDRESS
CONFIDENTIALITY PROGRAM.
(F) “PROGRAM PARTICIPANT” MEANS A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL
DESIGNATED AS A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) “PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL” MEANS:
(1) AN ATTORNEY EMPLOYED BY THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL;
(2) THE STATE PROSECUTOR;
(3) A STATE’S ATTORNEY OR ASSISTANT STATE’S ATTORNEY;
(4) A U.S. ATTORNEY OR OTHER FEDERAL PROSECUTOR DOMICILED
IN THE STATE;
(5) A CURRENT OR RETIRED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER AS
DEFINED IN § 1–101 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE;

SENATE BILL 121
(6) A CURRENT OR RETIRED MEMBER OF A POLICE FORCE OR OTHER
UNIT OF THE UNITED STATES WHO IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE PREVENTION AND
DETECTION OF CRIME AND THE ENFORCEMENT OF THE CRIMINAL LAWS OF THE
UNITED STATES DOMICILED IN THE STATE;
(7) A FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL ELECTED OFFICIAL; OR
(8) A SPOUSE, A CHILD, OR A DEPENDENT WHO RESIDES IN THE SAME
HOUSEHOLD AS AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN ITEMS (1) THROUGH (7) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(H) “PUBLISH” MEANS TO POST OR OTHERWISE MAKE AVAILABLE TO THE
GENERAL PUBLIC ON THE INTERNET, SOCIAL MEDIA, OR SOCIAL NETWORKS.
7–402.
(A) A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL, OR THE AGENCY, ENTITY, OR OFFICE IN
WHICH THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL SERVES OR SERVED, MAY REQUEST THAT A
GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY:
(1) NOT PUBLISH THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL’S PERSONAL
INFORMATION; OR
(2) REMOVE THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL’S PERSONAL
INFORMATION FROM ANY EXISTING PUBLICATION.
(B) A REQUEST MADE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) BE IN WRITING;
(2) BE SENT BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR BY E–MAIL;
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
PROVIDE SUFFICIENT INFORMATION TO CONFIRM THAT THE REQUESTER IS A
PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL; AND
(4) ADEQUATELY IDENTIFY THE DOCUMENT, POSTING, OR OTHER
PUBLICATION CONTAINING THE PERSONAL INFORMATION.
(C) A REQUEST MADE BY AN AGENCY, ENTITY, OR OFFICE IN WHICH A
PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL SERVES OR SERVED CERTIFIES THAT A REQUESTER IS A
PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL AND NO FURTHER INFORMATION MAY BE REQUIRED TO
CONFIRM THAT THE REQUESTER IS A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL.

SENATE BILL 121 5
(D) ON RECEIPT OF A REQUEST UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY SHALL PROMPTLY ACKNOWLEDGE RECEIPT OF THE
REQUEST IN WRITING BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR BY E–MAIL AND:
(1) TAKE STEPS REASONABLY NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT THE
PERSONAL INFORMATION IS NOT PUBLISHED; OR
(2) IF THE PERSONAL INFORMATION IS ALREADY PUBLISHED,
PROVIDE FOR THE REMOVAL OF THE PERSONAL INFORMATION WITHIN 72 HOURS
AFTER RECEIPT OF THE REQUEST.
(E) A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL, OR THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL ON BEHALF OF A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL, MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION AGAINST A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY FOR:
(1) DECLARATORY RELIEF;
(2) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; OR
(3) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
7–403.
(A) A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL, OR THE AGENCY, ENTITY, OR OFFICE IN
WHICH THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL SERVES OR SERVED, MAY REQUEST THAT A
PERSON WHO HAS PUBLISHED THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL’S PERSONAL
INFORMATION REMOVE THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL’S PERSONAL INFORMATION
FROM PUBLICATION.
(B) A REQUEST MADE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) BE IN WRITING;
(2) BE SENT BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR BY E–MAIL;
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
PROVIDE SUFFICIENT INFORMATION TO CONFIRM THAT THE REQUESTER IS A
PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL; AND
(4) ADEQUATELY IDENTIFY THE DOCUMENT, POSTING, OR OTHER
PUBLICATION CONTAINING THE PERSONAL INFORMATION.

SENATE BILL 121
(C) A REQUEST MADE BY AN AGENCY, ENTITY, OR OFFICE IN WHICH A
PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL SERVES OR SERVED CERTIFIES THAT A REQUESTER IS A
PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL AND NO FURTHER INFORMATION MAY BE REQUIRED TO
CONFIRM THAT THE REQUESTER IS A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL.
(D) THE PERSON TO WHOM THE REQUEST IS MADE SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE FOR THE REMOVAL OF THE PERSONAL INFORMATION
WITHIN 72 HOURS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE REQUEST; AND
(2) NOTIFY THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL OR THE OFFICE IN WHICH
THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL SERVES OR SERVED BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR BY E–MAIL
OF THE REMOVAL.
(E) (1) A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL, OR THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL ON BEHALF OF A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL, MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION AGAINST A PERSON FOR:
(I) DECLARATORY RELIEF;
(II) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF;
(III) DAMAGES INCURRED AS THE RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF
THIS SECTION; OR
(IV) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE RELIEF PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF A COURT FINDS THAT A PERSON WILLFULLY REFUSED TO
PROVIDE FOR THE REMOVAL OF PERSONAL INFORMATION KNOWING THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL ON BEHALF OF WHOM THE REQUEST WAS MADE WAS A PROTECTED
INDIVIDUAL, THE COURT MAY AWARD PUNITIVE DAMAGES.
7–404.
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT KNOWINGLY PUBLISH THE PERSONAL
INFORMATION OF A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL IF:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL KNOWS OR REASONABLY SHOULD KNOW THAT
PUBLISHING THE PERSONAL INFORMATION POSES AN IMMINENT AND SERIOUS
THREAT TO THE PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL; AND
(2) THE PUBLISHING OF THE PERSONAL INFORMATION RESULTS IN:

SENATE BILL 121 7
(I) AN ASSAULT IN ANY DEGREE;
(II) HARASSMENT;
(III) TRESPASS; OR
(IV) MALICIOUS DESTRUCTION OF PROPERTY.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 18 MONTHS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.
7–405.
(A) THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION IS TO:
(1) ENABLE STATE AND LOCAL AGENCIES TO RESPOND TO REQUESTS
FOR PUBLIC RECORDS WITHOUT DISCLOSING THE ACTUAL ADDRESS OF A PROGRAM
PARTICIPANT;
(2) ENCOURAGE INTERAGENCY COOPERATION IN PROVIDING
ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY FOR PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS; AND
(3) ALLOW GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES AND PERSONS TO ACCEPT A
PROGRAM PARTICIPANT’S USE OF AN ADDRESS DESIGNATED BY THE SECRETARY OF
STATE AS A SUBSTITUTE ADDRESS.
(B) (1) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL ESTABLISH AND ADMINISTER A
PUBLIC SERVANT ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY PROGRAM FOR PROTECTED
INDIVIDUALS.
(2) A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL MAY APPLY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
PROGRAM IN THE MANNER REQUIRED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE.
(3) ON RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
PROGRAM, THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER THE
APPLICANT QUALIFIES AS A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT.
(C) (1) A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT MAY:

SENATE BILL 121
(I) REQUEST THAT A PERSON OR GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY USE
A SUBSTITUTE ADDRESS DESIGNATED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE AS THE
PROGRAM PARTICIPANT’S ADDRESS;
(II) REQUEST THE SHIELDING OF REAL PROPERTY RECORDS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 1, PART II OF THE REAL PROPERTY
ARTICLE; AND
(III) REQUEST THAT A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT’S ACTUAL
ADDRESS BE SHIELDED FROM PUBLIC INSPECTION IN A RECORD MAINTAINED BY A
GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY.
(2) ON RECEIPT OF A REQUEST UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION BY A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT, A PERSON OR GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY
SHALL:
(I) PROMPTLY ACKNOWLEDGE RECEIPT OF THE REQUEST IN
WRITING BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR BY E–MAIL; AND
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (3) AND (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, TAKE STEPS REASONABLY NECESSARY TO COMPLY WITH THE
REQUEST.
(3) A CUSTODIAN OF RECORD MAY:
(I) MAINTAIN A COPY OF A RECORD CONTAINING A PROGRAM
PARTICIPANT’S ACTUAL ADDRESS IN A SEPARATE SECURE AREA TO WHICH PERSONS
WHO DO NOT HAVE A LEGITIMATE REASON FOR ACCESS ARE DENIED ACCESS;
(II) PERMIT PUBLIC INSPECTION OF A RECORD WITH THE
CONSENT OF THE PROGRAM PARTICIPANT;
(III) PERMIT PUBLIC INSPECTION OF A RECORD WITH THE
ACTUAL ADDRESS REDACTED FROM THE RECORD; OR
(IV) AFTER NOTIFICATION TO THE PROGRAM PARTICIPANT,
PERMIT PUBLIC INSPECTION OF A RECORD IF THE INSPECTION WILL FURTHER A
SUBSTANTIAL PUBLIC INTEREST OR A LEGITIMATE BUSINESS NEED.
(4) (I) EACH LOCAL BOARD OF ELECTIONS SHALL USE A PROGRAM
PARTICIPANT’S ACTUAL ADDRESS FOR ALL ELECTION–RELATED PURPOSES.

SENATE BILL 121 9
(II) A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT MAY NOT USE THE SUBSTITUTE
ADDRESS DESIGNATED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE AS THE PROGRAM
PARTICIPANT’S ADDRESS FOR:
1. VOTER REGISTRATION;
2. A CERTIFICATE OF CANDIDACY FILED UNDER § 5–301
OF THE ELECTION LAW ARTICLE; OR
3. CAMPAIGN FINANCE REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
UNDER TITLE 13 OF THE ELECTION LAW ARTICLE.
(III) A LOCAL BOARD OF ELECTIONS MAY NOT MAKE A PROGRAM
PARTICIPANT’S ADDRESS CONTAINED IN VOTER REGISTRATION, CERTIFICATE OF
CANDIDACY, OR CAMPAIGN FINANCE REPORTING RECORDS AVAILABLE FOR PUBLIC
INSPECTION OR COPYING EXCEPT:
1. ON REQUEST BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY FOR
LAW ENFORCEMENT PURPOSES;
2. AS DIRECTED BY A COURT ORDER TO DISCLOSE THE
ADDRESS; AND
3. FOR A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT WHO IS AN ELECTED
OFFICIAL, AS REQUIRED UNDER STATE ELECTION LAW.
(D) A RECORD OF A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT’S ACTUAL ADDRESS AND
TELEPHONE NUMBER MAINTAINED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE OR A
GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY IS NOT A PUBLIC RECORD WITHIN THE MEANING OF §
4–101 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
(E) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY DISCLOSE A PROGRAM
PARTICIPANT’S ACTUAL ADDRESS.
(2) A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL, OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ON
BEHALF OF A PROTECTED INDIVIDUAL, MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR A VIOLATION OF
THIS SUBSECTION FOR:
(I) DECLARATORY RELIEF;
(II) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; OR
(III) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.

SENATE BILL 121
Article – Real Property
3–114.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Address Confidentiality Program” means [the]:
(1) THE Address Confidentiality Program for survivors of threatened,
attempted, or actual domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking, harassment, or human
trafficking administered by the Secretary under Title 7, Subtitle 3 of the State Government
Article;
(2) THE PUBLIC SERVANT ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY PROGRAM
ADMINISTERED BY THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE UNDER TITLE 7,
SUBTITLE 4 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; and [the]
(3) THE Judicial Address Confidentiality Program administered by the
Administrative Office of the Courts under Title 3, Subtitle 24 of the Courts Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.